California statutes. Penal Code
(1) Dishonesty relating to the reporting, investigation, or prosecution of a crime, or relating to the reporting of, or investigation of misconduct by, a peace officer or custodial officer, including, but not limited to, false statements, intentionally filing false reports, tampering with, falsifying, destroying, or concealing evidence, perjury, and tampering with data
 recorded by a body-worn camera or other recording device for purposes of concealing misconduct.

(2) Abuse of power, including, but not limited to, intimidating witnesses, knowingly obtaining a false confession, and knowingly making a false arrest.

(3) Physical abuse, including, but not limited to, the excessive or unreasonable use of force.

(4) Sexual assault, as described in subdivision (b) of Section 832.7.

(5) Demonstrating bias on the basis of race, national origin, religion, gender identity or expression, housing status, sexual orientation, mental or physical disability, or other protected status in violation of law or department policy or
 inconsistent with a peace officer’s obligation to carry out their duties in a fair and unbiased manner. This paragraph does not limit an employee’s rights under the First Amendment to the United States Constitution.

(6) Acts that violate the law and are sufficiently egregious or repeated as to be inconsistent with a peace officer’s obligation to uphold the law or respect the rights of members of the public, as determined by the commission.

(7) Participation in a law enforcement gang. For the purpose of this paragraph, a “law enforcement gang” means a group of peace officers within a law enforcement agency who may identify themselves by a name and may be associated with an identifying symbol, including, but not limited to, matching tattoos, and who engage in a pattern of on-duty
 behavior that intentionally violates the law or fundamental principles of professional policing, including, but not limited to, excluding, harassing, or discriminating against any individual based on a protected category under federal or state antidiscrimination laws, engaging in or promoting conduct that violates the rights of other employees or members of the public, violating agency policy, the persistent practice of unlawful detention or use of excessive force in circumstances where it is known to be unjustified, falsifying police reports, fabricating or destroying evidence, targeting persons for enforcement based solely on protected characteristics of those persons, theft, unauthorized use of alcohol or drugs on duty, unlawful or unauthorized protection of other members from disciplinary actions, and retaliation against other officers who threaten or interfere with the activities of the
 group.

(8) Failure to cooperate with an investigation into potential police misconduct, including an investigation conducted pursuant to this chapter. For purposes of this paragraph, the lawful exercise of rights granted under the United States Constitution, the California Constitution, or any other law shall not be considered a failure to cooperate.

(9) Failure to intercede when present and observing another officer using force that is clearly beyond that which is necessary, as determined by an objectively reasonable officer under the circumstances, taking into account the possibility that other officers may have additional information regarding the threat posed by a subject.

(c) (1) Beginning no later than January 1, 2023, each law enforcement agency shall be responsible for the completion of investigations of allegations of serious misconduct by a peace officer, regardless of their employment status.

(2) The division shall promptly review any grounds for decertification described in subdivision (a) received from an agency. The division shall have the authority to review any agency or other investigative authority file, as well as to conduct additional investigation, if necessary. The division shall have the authority to inspect or duplicate any criminal history information, criminal offender record information, or criminal justice information, including information contained in or derived from the California Law Enforcement Telecommunications System and any other information that would otherwise be
 confidential, privileged, or subject to any other restriction on disclosure when that information is included as part of an investigation involving a matter within the commission’s jurisdiction. The division shall only have authority to review and investigate allegations for purposes of decertification.

(3) (A) The board, in their discretion, may request that the division review an investigative file or recommend that the commission direct the division to investigate any potential grounds for decertification of a peace officer. Those requests and recommendations from the board to the division or commission
 must be based upon a decision by a majority vote.

(B) The commission, in its discretion, may direct the division to review an investigative file. The commission, either upon its own motion or in response to a recommendation from the board, may direct the division to investigate any potential grounds for decertification of a peace officer.

(C) The division, in its discretion, may investigate without the request of the commission or board any potential grounds for revocation of certification of a peace officer.

(4) The division, in carrying out any investigation initiated pursuant to this section or any other duty shall have all of the powers of investigation granted pursuant to Article 2 (commencing with
 Section 11180) of Chapter 2 of Part 1 of Division 3 of Title 2 of the Government Code.

(5) Notwithstanding any other law, the investigation shall be completed within three years after the receipt of the completed report of the disciplinary or internal affairs investigation from the employing agency pursuant to Section 13510.9, however, no time limit shall apply if a report of the conduct was not made to the commission. An investigation shall be considered completed upon a notice of intent to deny, suspend, or revoke certification issued pursuant to paragraph (1) of subdivision (a) of Section 13510.85. The time limit shall be tolled during the appeal of a termination or other disciplinary action through an administrative or judicial proceeding or during any criminal prosecution of the peace officer. The commission shall consider the peace
 officer’s prior conduct and service record, and any instances of misconduct, including any incidents occurring beyond the time limitation for investigation in evaluating whether to revoke certification for the incident under investigation.

(6) An action by an agency or decision resulting from an appeal of an agency’s action does not preclude action by the commission to investigate, suspend, or revoke a peace officer’s certification pursuant to this section. Whether a particular factual or legal determination in a prior appeal proceeding shall have preclusive effect in proceedings under this chapter shall be governed by the existing law of collateral estoppel.

(d) Upon arrest or indictment of a peace officer for any crime described in Section 1029 of the Government Code, or
 discharge from any law enforcement agency for grounds set forth in subdivision (a), or separation from employment of a peace officer during a pending investigation into allegations of serious misconduct, the executive director shall order the immediate temporary suspension of any certificate or proof of eligibility held by that peace officer upon the determination by the executive director that the temporary suspension is in the best interest of the health, safety, or welfare of the public. The order of temporary suspension shall be made in writing and shall specify the basis for the executive director’s determination. Following the issuance of a temporary suspension order, proceedings of the commission in the exercise of its authority to discipline any peace officer shall be promptly scheduled as provided for in this section. The temporary suspension shall continue in effect until issuance of the final
 decision on revocation pursuant to this section or until the order is withdrawn by the executive director.

(e) Records of an investigation of any person by the commission shall be retained for 30 years following the date that the investigation is deemed concluded by the commission. The commission may destroy records prior to the expiration of the 30-year retention period if the subject is deceased and no action upon the complaint was taken by the commission beyond the commission’s initial intake of the complaint.

(f) Any peace officer may voluntarily surrender their certification permanently. Voluntary permanent surrender of certification pursuant to this subdivision shall have the same effect as revocation. Voluntary permanent surrender is not the same as placement of a valid
 certification into inactive status during a period in which a person is not actively employed as a peace officer. A permanently surrendered certification cannot be reactivated.

(g) (1) The commission may initiate proceedings to revoke or suspend a peace officer’s certification for conduct that occurred before January 1, 2022, only for either of the following:

(A) Serious misconduct pursuant to paragraph (1) or (4) of subdivision (b) or pursuant to paragraph (3) of subdivision (b) for the use of deadly force that results in death or serious bodily injury.

(B) If the employing agency makes a final determination regarding its investigation of the misconduct after January 1, 2022.

(2) Nothing in this subdivision prevents the commission from considering the peace officer’s prior conduct and service record in determining whether suspension or revocation is appropriate for serious misconduct.

(h) (1) A revocation of certification shall not be undertaken pursuant to this section because of a court finding made in a challenge brought pursuant to Section 745.

(2) This subdivision does not prohibit revocation based on the underlying acts or omissions which formed the basis of the action brought pursuant to Section 745, if the revocation otherwise conforms to all the rules and procedures applicable to those proceedings, and the officer is accorded all due process protections provided
 in those proceedings.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2025, Ch. 784, Sec. 5.   (SB 734)   Effective January 1, 2026.)
-------------------------------------------

13510.85.

(a) (1) When, upon the completion of a serious misconduct investigation conducted pursuant to subdivision (c) of Section 13510.8, the division finds reasonable grounds for the denial, revocation, or suspension of a peace officer’s certification, it shall take the appropriate steps to promptly notify the peace officer involved, in writing, of its determination and reasons therefore, and shall provide the peace officer with a detailed explanation of the decertification procedure and the peace officer’s rights to contest and appeal.

(2) Upon notification, the peace officer may, within 30 days, file a request for a review of the determination by the board and commission. If the peace officer does not file a request for review within 30 days, the peace officer’s certification shall be suspended or revoked, consistent with the division’s determination, without further proceedings. If the peace officer files a timely review, the board shall schedule the case for hearing.

(3) The board shall meet as required to conduct public hearings, but no fewer than four times per year.

(4) At each public hearing, the board shall review the findings of investigations presented by the division pursuant to paragraph (1) and shall make a recommendation on what action should
 be taken on the certification of the peace officer involved. The board shall only recommend revocation if the factual basis for revocation is established by clear and convincing evidence. If the board determines that the facts and circumstances revealed by the investigation warrant a sanction other than revocation, it may recommend that a peace officer’s certification be suspended for a period of time. The board shall issue a written decision explaining its reasons for decertification or suspension.

(5) The commission shall review all recommendations made by the board. The commission’s decision to adopt a recommendation by the board to seek revocation shall require a two-thirds vote of commissioners present and shall be based on whether the record, in its entirety, supports the board’s conclusion that serious misconduct has been
 established by clear and convincing evidence. In any case in which the commission reaches a different determination than the board’s recommendation, it shall set forth its analysis and reasons for reaching a different determination in writing.

(6) The commission shall return any determination requiring action to be taken against an individual’s certification to the division, which shall initiate proceedings for a formal hearing before an administrative law judge in accordance with the Administrative Procedure Act (Chapter 5 (commencing with Section 11500) of Part 1 of Division 3 of Title 2 of the Government Code), which shall be subject to judicial review as set forth in that act.

(b) Notwithstanding Section 832.7, the hearings of the board and the review by the
 commission under this section, administrative adjudications held pursuant to paragraph (6) of subdivision (a), and any records introduced during those proceedings, shall be public.
 These public records may, in the discretion of the division, be redacted for the reasons set forth in paragraphs (6) and (7) of subdivision (b) of Section 832.7. This subdivision does not preclude the board or the commission, or both, from reviewing the unredacted versions of these records in closed session and using them as the basis for any action taken.

(c) The commission shall publish the names of any peace officer whose certification is suspended or revoked and the basis for the suspension or revocation and shall notify the National Decertification Index of the International Association of Directors of Law Enforcement Standards and Training of the suspension or
 revocation.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2023, Ch. 397, Sec. 3.   (SB 449)   Effective January 1, 2024.)
-------------------------------------------

13510.9.

(a) Beginning January 1, 2023, any agency employing peace officers shall report to the commission within 10 days, in a form specified by the commission, any of the following events:

(1) The employment, appointment, or termination or separation from employment or appointment, by that agency, of any peace officer. Separation from employment or appointment includes any involuntary termination, resignation, or retirement.

(2) Any complaint, charge, or allegation of conduct against a peace officer employed by that agency that could render a peace officer subject to suspension or revocation of certification by the commission pursuant
 to Section 13510.8.

(3) Any finding or recommendation by a civilian oversight entity, including a civilian review board, civilian police commission, police chief, or civilian inspector general, that a peace officer employed by that agency engaged in conduct that could render a peace officer subject to suspension or revocation of certification by the commission pursuant to Section 13510.8.

(4) The final disposition of any investigation that determines a peace officer engaged in conduct that could render a peace officer subject to suspension or revocation of certification by the commission pursuant to Section 13510.8, regardless of the discipline imposed.

(5) Any civil judgment or court finding against a peace officer based
 on conduct, or settlement of a civil claim against a peace officer or an agency based on allegations of officer conduct that could render a peace officer subject to suspension or revocation of certification by the commission pursuant to Section 13510.8.

(b) By July 1, 2023, any agency employing peace officers shall report to the commission any events described in subdivision (a) that occurred between January 1, 2020, and January 1, 2023.

(c) (1) An agency employing peace officers shall make available for inspection or duplication by the commission any investigation into any matter reported pursuant to paragraph (2) of subdivision (a), including any physical or documentary evidence, witness statements, analysis, and conclusions, for no less than two years after
 reporting of the finding or recommendation reported pursuant to paragraph (3) of subdivision (a), the final disposition of the investigation reported pursuant to paragraph (4) of subdivision (a), or the civil judgment or court finding reported pursuant to paragraph (5) of subdivision (a), as applicable, whichever is latest.

(2) Notwithstanding any other law, the commission shall have the authority to inspect or duplicate any criminal history information, criminal offender record information, or criminal justice information, including information contained in or derived from the California Law Enforcement Telecommunications System, or any other information that would otherwise be confidential, privileged, or subject to any other restriction on disclosure, when that information is included as part of an investigation involving a matter
 within the commission’s jurisdiction.

(d) (1) In a case of separation from employment or appointment, the employing agency shall execute and maintain an affidavit-of-separation form adopted by the commission describing the reason for separation and shall include whether the separation is part of the resolution or settlement of any criminal, civil, or administrative charge or investigation. The affidavit shall be signed under penalty of perjury and submitted to the commission.

(2) A peace officer who has separated from employment or appointment shall be permitted to respond to the affidavit-of-separation form, in writing, to the commission, setting forth their understanding of the facts and reasons for the separation, if different from those provided by the
 agency.

(3) Before employing or appointing any peace officer who has previously been employed or appointed as a peace officer by another agency, the agency shall contact the commission to inquire as to the facts and reasons a peace officer became separated from any previous employing agency. The commission shall, upon request and without prejudice, provide to the subsequent employing agency any information regarding the separation in its possession.

(4) Civil liability shall not be imposed on either a law enforcement agency or the commission, or any of the agency’s or commission’s agents, for providing information pursuant to this section in a good faith belief that the information is accurate.

(e) (1) An agency employing a peace officer shall not enter into an agreement with a peace officer that requires any of the following:

(A) The agency to destroy, remove, or conceal a record of a misconduct investigation.

(B) The agency to halt or make particular findings in a misconduct investigation.

(C) The agency to otherwise restrict the disclosure of information about an allegation or investigation of misconduct pursuant to any provision of law, including, but not limited to, this section, or Sections 832.7, 832.12, 1054.1, 13510.8, or 13510.85 of this code.

(2) A provision of an agreement inconsistent with this subdivision is contrary to
 law and public policy and is void and unenforceable.

(f) The commission shall maintain the information reported pursuant to this section, in a form determined by the commission,
 and in a manner that may be accessed by the subject peace officer, any employing law enforcement agency of that peace officer, any law enforcement agency that is performing a preemployment background investigation of that peace officer, or the commission when necessary for the purposes of decertification. This information may be withheld from the subject peace officer if the commission determines that disclosure pursuant to this section may jeopardize an ongoing investigation, put a victim or witness at risk of any form of harm or injury, or may otherwise create a risk of any form of harm or injury that outweighs the interest in disclosure, until the risk of harm or injury is ended or mitigated so that the interest in disclosure is no longer outweighed by the interest in nondisclosure. Information that the commission releases to an agency pursuant to this section that has been withheld
 from the subject peace officer shall be kept confidential by the receiving agency.

(g) (1) The commission shall notify the head of the agency that employs the peace officer of all of the following:

(A) The initiation of any investigation of that peace officer by the division, unless that notification would interfere with the investigation.

(B) A finding by the division, following an investigation or review of the investigation, of grounds to take action against the peace officer’s certification or application.

(C) A final determination by the commission as to whether action should be taken against a peace officer’s certification or
 application.

(D) An adjudication, after hearing, resulting in action against an officer’s certification or application.

(2) If the certificate of a peace officer is temporarily suspended pursuant to subdivision (d) of Section 13510.8, or revoked, the commission shall also notify the district attorney of the county in which the peace officer is or was employed of this fact.

(3) Each notification required by this subdivision shall include the name of the peace officer and a summary of the basis for the action requiring notification.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2025, Ch. 729, Sec. 3.   (AB 1388)   Effective January 1, 2026.)
-------------------------------------------

13511.

(a) In establishing standards for training, the commission shall, so far as consistent with the purposes of this chapter, permit required training to be obtained at institutions approved by the commission.

(b) In those instances where individuals have acquired prior comparable peace officer training, the commission shall, adopt regulations providing for alternative means for satisfying the training required by Section 832.3. The commission shall charge a fee to cover administrative costs associated with the testing conducted under this subdivision.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2000, Ch. 354, Sec. 1.   Effective January 1, 2001.)
-------------------------------------------

13511.1.

(a) The commission, stakeholders from law enforcement, including representatives of law enforcement administration and law enforcement employees, the California State University, including administration and faculty members, and community organizations shall serve as advisors to the office of the Chancellor of the California Community Colleges to develop a modern policing degree program. By June 1, 2023, the office of the Chancellor of the California Community Colleges, in consultation with the stakeholders, shall submit a report on recommendations to the Legislature outlining a plan to implement this program. The recommendations in the report shall:

(1) Focus on courses pertinent to law enforcement, which shall include, but not be limited to, psychology,
 communications, history, ethnic studies, law, and those determined to develop necessary critical thinking skills and emotional intelligence.

(2) Include allowances for prior law enforcement experience, and appropriate work experience, postsecondary education experience, or military experience to satisfy a portion of the employment eligibility requirements.

(A) It is the intent of the Legislature that allowances for prior experience in this paragraph for those with military experience may be provided to those with military specializations pertinent to law enforcement, including those specializations in community relations, deescalation, foreign language translators, and those determined to require necessary critical thinking skills and emotional intelligence.

(B) It is the intent of the Legislature that allowances for
 prior experience specified in this paragraph shall be granted to those of good moral character, and shall not be granted to those with prior sustained disciplinary actions taken against them, except that the Commission on Peace Officer Standards and Training may, after considering the severity of the sustained misconduct or violation, grant a partial allowance.

(3) Include both the modern policing degree program and bachelor’s degree in the discipline of their choosing as minimum education requirements for employment as a peace officer.

(4) Include recommendations to adopt financial assistance for students of historically underserved and disadvantaged communities with barriers to higher education access that fulfill the minimum education requirements to be adopted, pursuant to this section, for employment as a peace officer.

(b) The report to be submitted pursuant to subdivision (a) shall be submitted in compliance with Section 9795 of the Government Code.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2025, Ch. 218, Sec. 1.   (SB 385)   Effective October 1, 2025.)
-------------------------------------------

13511.3.

The commission may evaluate and approve pertinent training previously completed by any jurisdiction’s law enforcement officers as meeting current training requirements prescribed by the commission pursuant to this chapter. The evaluations performed by the commission shall conform to the standards established under this chapter.

(History: Added by Stats. 1994, Ch. 43, Sec. 2.   Effective January 1, 1995.)
-------------------------------------------

13511.5.

Each applicant for admission to a basic course of training certified by the Commission on Peace Officer Standards and Training that includes the carrying and use of firearms, as prescribed by subdivision (a) of Section 832 and subdivision (a) of Section 832.3, who is not sponsored by a local or other law enforcement agency, or is not a peace officer employed by a state or local agency, department, or district, shall be required to submit written certification from the Department of Justice pursuant to Sections 11122, 11123, and 11124 that the applicant is eligible to possess, receive, own, and purchase a firearm pursuant to state and federal law.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2024, Ch. 495, Sec. 12.   (SB 1518)   Effective January 1, 2025.)
-------------------------------------------

13512.

(a) The commission shall make such inquiries as may be necessary to determine whether every city, county, city and county, and district receiving state aid pursuant to this chapter is adhering to the standards for recruitment, training, certification, and reporting established pursuant to this chapter.

(b) The board shall prepare an annual report on the activities of the commission, board, division, and subject agencies regarding peace officer certification under this chapter. The report shall include, without limitation, all of the following: 

(1) The number of applications for
 certification and the number of certifications granted or denied.

(2) The number of events reported pursuant to paragraphs (1) to (5), inclusive, of subdivision (a) of Section 13510.9.

(3) The criteria and process for review and investigation by the division, the number of reviews, and the number of investigations conducted by the division.

(4) The number of notices sent by the division pursuant to paragraph (1) of subdivision (a) of Section 13510.85, the number of requests for review received, and the number of suspensions or revocations or denials made pursuant to paragraph (2) of subdivision (a) of Section 13510.85.

(5) The number of review hearings held by the
 board and commission and the outcomes of those review hearings.

(6) The number of administrative hearings held on suspensions or revocations and the number of suspensions or revocations resulting from those hearings.

(7) Any cases of judicial review of commission actions on suspension or revocation and the result of those cases.

(8) The number of certifications voluntarily surrendered and the number placed on inactive status.

(9) Any compliance audits or reviews conducted pursuant to this chapter and the results of those audits.

(10) Any other information the board deems relevant to evaluating
 the functioning of the certification program, the decertification process, and the staffing levels of the division.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2021, Ch. 409, Sec. 16.   (SB 2)   Effective January 1, 2022.)
-------------------------------------------

13513.

Upon the request of a local jurisdiction, the commission shall provide a counseling service to such local jurisdiction for the purpose of improving the administration, management or operations of a police agency and may aid such jurisdiction in implementing improved practices and techniques.

(History: Added by Stats. 1967, Ch. 1640.)
-------------------------------------------

13514.

The commission shall prepare a course of instruction for the training of peace officers in the use of tear gas. Such course of instruction may be given, upon approval by the commission, by any agency or institution engaged in the training or instruction of peace officers.

(History: Added by Stats. 1969, Ch. 1231.)
-------------------------------------------

13514.1.

(a) On or before July 1, 2005, the commission shall develop and disseminate guidelines and standardized training recommendations for all law enforcement officers, supervisors, and managers whose agency assigns them to perform, supervise, or manage Special Weapons and Tactics (SWAT) operations. The guidelines and standardized training recommendations shall be available for use by law enforcement agencies that conduct SWAT operations.

(b) The training and guidelines shall be developed in consultation with law enforcement officers, the Attorney General’s office, supervisors, and managers, SWAT trainers, legal advisers, and others selected by
 the commission. Development of the training and guidelines shall include consideration of the recommendations contained in the Attorney General’s Commission on Special Weapons and Tactics (S.W.A.T.) Final Report of 2002.

(c) The standardized training recommendations shall at a minimum include initial training requirements for SWAT operations, refresher or advanced training for experienced SWAT members, and supervision and management of SWAT operations.

(d) The guidelines shall at minimum address legal and practical issues of SWAT operations, personnel selection, fitness requirements, planning, hostage negotiation, tactical issues, safety, rescue methods, after-action evaluation of
 operations, logistical and resource needs, uniform and firearms requirements, risk assessment, policy considerations, and multijurisdictional SWAT operations. The guidelines may also address tactical casualty care.

(e) The guidelines shall provide procedures for approving the prior training of officers, supervisors, and managers that meet the standards and guidelines developed by the commission pursuant to this section, in order to avoid duplicative training.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2014, Ch. 668, Sec. 5.   (AB 1598)   Effective January 1, 2015.)
-------------------------------------------

13514.5.

(a) The commission shall implement on or before July 1, 1999, a course or courses of instruction for the training of law enforcement officers in the handling of acts of civil disobedience and adopt guidelines that may be followed by police agencies in responding to acts of civil disobedience.

(b) The course of training for law enforcement officers shall include adequate consideration of all of the following subjects:

(1) Reasonable use of force.

(2) Dispute resolution.

(3) Nature and extent of civil disobedience, whether it be passive or active resistance.

(4) Media relations.

(5) Public and officer safety.

(6) Documentation, report writing, and evidence collection.

(7) Crowd control.

(c) (1) All law enforcement officers who have received their basic training before July 1, 1999, may participate in supplementary training on responding to acts of civil disobedience, as prescribed and certified by the commission.

(2) Law enforcement agencies are encouraged to include, as part of their advanced officer training program, periodic updates and training on responding to acts of civil disobedience. The commission shall assist these agencies where possible.

(d) (1) The course of instruction, the learning and performance objectives, the standards for the training and the guidelines shall be developed by the commission in consultation with appropriate groups and individuals having expertise in responding to acts of civil disobedience. The groups and individuals shall include, but not be limited to, law enforcement agencies, police academy instructors, subject matter experts and members of the public. Different regional interests such as rural, suburban, and urban interests may be represented by the participating parties.

(2) The commission, in consultation with the groups and individuals described in paragraph (1), shall review existing training programs to determine in what ways civil disobedience training may be included as part of ongoing programs.

(e) As used in this section, “law enforcement officer” means any peace officer as defined in Chapter 4.5 (commencing with Section 830) of Title 3.

(f) It is the intent of the Legislature in enacting this section to provide law enforcement officers with additional training so as to control acts of civil disobedience with reasonable use of force and to ensure public and officer safety with minimum disruption to commerce and community affairs.

(g) It is also the intent of the Legislature in enacting this section that the guidelines to be developed by the commission should take into consideration the roles and responsibilities of all law enforcement officers responding to acts of civil disobedience.

(History: Added by Stats. 1998, Ch. 207, Sec. 1.   Effective January 1, 1999.)
-------------------------------------------

13515.

(a) Every city police officer or deputy sheriff at a supervisory level and below who is assigned field or investigative duties shall complete an elder and dependent adult abuse training course certified by the Commission on Peace Officer Standards and Training within 18 months of assignment to field duties. Completion of the course may be satisfied by telecourse, video training tape, or other instruction. The training, at a minimum, shall include all of the following subjects:

(1) Relevant laws.

(2) Recognition of elder and dependent adult abuse.

(3) Reporting
 requirements and procedures.

(4) Neglect of elders and dependent adults.

(5) Fraud of elders and dependent adults.

(6) Physical abuse of elders and dependent adults.

(7) Psychological abuse of elders and dependent adults.

(8) The role of the local adult protective services and public guardian offices.

(9) The legal rights of, and remedies available to, victims of elder or dependent adult abuse pursuant to Section 15657.03 of the Welfare and Institutions Code, including emergency protective orders and the option to request a simultaneous move-out
 order, and temporary restraining orders.

(b) When producing new or updated training materials pursuant to this section, the commission shall consult with the Division of Medi-Cal Fraud and Elder Abuse, local adult protective services offices, the Office of the State Long-Term Care Ombudsman, and other subject matter experts. Any new or updated training materials shall address all of the following:

(1) The jurisdiction and responsibility of law enforcement agencies pursuant to Section 368.5.

(2) The fact that the protected classes of “dependent person” as defined in Section 288 and “dependent adult” as defined in Section 368 include many persons with disabilities, regardless of the fact that most of those persons
 live independently.

(3) Other relevant information and laws.

(c) The commission also may inform the law enforcement agencies of other relevant training materials.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2021, Ch. 554, Sec. 9.   (SB 823)   Effective January 1, 2022.)
-------------------------------------------

13515.25.

(a) The Commission on Peace Officer Standards and Training shall establish and keep updated a continuing education classroom training course relating to law enforcement interaction with persons with mental disabilities. The training course shall be developed by the commission in consultation with appropriate community, local, and state organizations and agencies that have expertise in the area of mental illness and developmental disability, and with appropriate consumer and family advocate groups. In developing the course, the commission shall also examine existing courses certified by the commission that relate to persons with mental disabilities. The commission shall make the course available to law enforcement agencies in California.

(b) The course described in subdivision (a) shall consist of classroom instruction and shall utilize interactive training methods to ensure that the training is as realistic as possible. The course shall include, at a minimum, core instruction in all of the following:

(1) The cause and nature of mental illnesses and developmental disabilities.

(2) How to identify indicators of mental disability and how to respond appropriately in a variety of common situations.

(3) Conflict resolution and de-escalation techniques for potentially dangerous situations involving a person with a mental disability.

(4) Appropriate language usage when interacting with a person with a mental disability.

(5) Alternatives to lethal force when interacting with potentially dangerous persons with mental disabilities.

(6) Community and state resources available to serve persons with mental disabilities and how these resources can be best utilized by law enforcement to benefit the mentally disabled community.

(7) The fact that a crime committed in whole or in part because of an actual or perceived disability of the victim is a hate crime punishable under Title 11.6 (commencing with Section 422.55) of Part 1.

(c) The course described in subdivision (a) shall be shared with the State Fire Marshal, who may revise the course as appropriate to the firefighter training environment.

(d) The Legislature
 encourages law enforcement agencies to include the course created in this section, and any other course certified by the commission relating to persons with mental disabilities, as part of their advanced officer training program.

(e) It is the intent of the Legislature to reevaluate the extent to which law enforcement officers are receiving adequate training in how to interact with persons with mental disabilities.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2016, Ch. 367, Sec. 1.   (SB 1221)   Effective January 1, 2017.)
-------------------------------------------

13515.26.

(a) The commission shall review the training module in the regular basic course relating to persons with a mental illness, intellectual disability, or substance use disorder, and analyze existing training curricula in order to identify areas where additional training is needed to better prepare law enforcement to effectively address incidents involving mentally disabled persons.

(b) Upon identifying what additional training is needed, the commission shall update the training in consultation with appropriate community, local, and state organizations, and agencies that have expertise in the area of mental illness, intellectual disability, and substance use disorders, and with
 appropriate consumer and family advocate groups.
